North Dakota, session 69, SB2334.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 53-06.1-01 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. "Alcoholic beverage establishment" means an establishment licensed under section 5 - 01 - 21
or chapter 5-02 where alcoholic beverages are sold, dispensed, and consumed by guests on
the premises. The term does not include a liquor store, gas station, grocery store, or
convenience store.
SECTION 2. LEGISLATIVE MANAGEMENT STUDY - OWNERSHIP OF ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGE ESTABLISHMENTS BY CHARITABLE GAMING ORGANIZATIONS.
1. During the 2025-26 interim, the legislative management shall consider studying the ownership
of alcoholic beverage establishments by licensed charitable gaming organizations. The study
must include:
a. The prevalence of the ownership of alcoholic beverage establishments by licensed
charitable gaming organizations;
b. The process of obtaining ownership of alcoholic beverage establishments, including the
use of subsidiaries, partnerships, and organizations;
c. The benefits and detriments of licensed charitable gaming organizations owning alcoholic
beverage establishments; and
d. The interaction between gaming manufacturers and distributors and licensed charitable
gaming organizations.
2. The legislative management shall report its findings and recommendations, together with any
legislation required to implement the recommendations, to the seventieth legislative assembly.

S. B. NO. 2334 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2334.
Senate Vote: Yeas 41 Nays 5 Absent 1
House Vote: Yeas 80 Nays 9 Absent 5
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State